New Mexico, session 2026, SB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 12, Article 5 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] APRIL 30--MIGUEL TRUJILLO DAY.--In recognition of the successful effort made by marine veteran and Pueblo of Isleta member Miguel Trujillo to secure voting rights for Native Americans living on tribal lands in New Mexico, his birthday, April 30, of each year is designated as "Miguel Trujillo day". Miguel Trujillo day is designated for the people of New Mexico to organize as a community to observe the day with education, celebration and reflection on voting rights and indigenous leadership." SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the Indian affairs department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to develop and distribute to the public educational materials about Miguel Trujillo; coordinate with tribes, schools and other public entities to support events in observance of Miguel Trujillo day; and create digital and print resources to expand awareness of Miguel Trujillo's life and accomplishments statewide. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -